Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.115

Smoke detection device awareness account.

The smoke detection device awareness account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fines imposed pursuant to RCW 43.44.110(5) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of raising public awareness of owners and tenants' duties pertaining to smoke detection devices under RCW 43.44.110 and of the danger to life and property resulting from a failure to comply with those duties and for administrative costs related to enforcement of the fine created in RCW 43.44.110(5)(b). Only the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or the director of fire protection's authorized deputy, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2019 c 455 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2019 c 455: See note following RCW 43.44.110.